Georgia statutes. 
Insufficient proof of insurance. - Resident who brought a negligence and nuisance suit against a city had not shown that the city waived sovereign immunity under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1 because a letter from a firm stating that the firm administered the city's insurance program did not suffice to show that the city had insurance. Gilbert v. City of Jackson, 287 Ga. App. 326, 651 S.E.2d 461 (2007).

Liability for contract and non-sovereign immunity torts. - Contract that included indemnification provision was void because a city could not waive the city's sovereign immunity under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1; although it was not clear whether the city could waive non-sovereign immunity torts and contract claims, because a train track and train owner confined itself to a sovereign immunity tort recovery theory while proceeding on only a contract claim without seeking leave to amend under Fed. R. Civ. P. 15(a), the plaintiffs' entire case against the city failed as a matter of law. CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 418 F. Supp. 2d 1366 (S.D. Ga. 2006), aff'd, 258 Fed. Appx. 287 (11th Cir. 2007).

Court must apply proper analysis. - Judgment of the appellate court affirming the trial court's grant of summary judgment to a city based on sovereign immunity was vacated because the appellate court, like the trial court's ruling on the city's motion, gave no consideration to whether the alleged negligence by the city occurred in the performance of a governmental function and did not acknowledge or apply the definitions of governmental and ministerial functions as those terms relate to the city's sovereign immunity. Primas v. City of Milledgeville, 296 Ga. 584, 769 S.E.2d 326 (2015).

No contractual agreement established with city through statutes or ordinances. - In a suit brought by taxi cab companies, the trial court properly granted the city's motion to dismiss because the taxi cab companies failed to establish that the statutes permitting the issuance of Certificates of Public Necessity and Convenience (CPNC), or the city's ordinances, created a clear and unequivocal intent by the city to create a contractual or franchise agreement that prevented the city allowing personal transportation network companies to operate in the city. Atlanta Metro Leasing, Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 353 Ga. App. 785, 839 S.E.2d 278 (2020).

Cited in Newton v. City of Moultrie, 39 Ga. App. 702, 148 S.E. 299 (1929); Ware County v. Cason, 189 Ga. 78, 5 S.E.2d 339 (1939); Hammock v. City Council, 83 Ga. App. 217, 63 S.E.2d 290 (1951); Rhodes v. Perlis, 83 Ga. App. 312, 63 S.E.2d 457 (1951); Caroway v. City of Atlanta, 85 Ga. App. 792, 70 S.E.2d 126 (1952); Hunter v. City of Atlanta, 212 Ga. 179, 91 S.E.2d 338 (1956); Poole v. City of Louisville, 107 Ga. App. 305, 130 S.E.2d 157 (1963); Mitchell v. City of Newnan, 125 Ga. App. 761, 188 S.E.2d 917 (1972); City of Hawkinsville v. Wilson & Wilson, Inc., 231 Ga. 110, 200 S.E.2d 262 (1973); Mason v. Town of Berlin, 128 Ga. App. 177, 196 S.E.2d 181 (1973); Morin v. City of Valdosta, 140 Ga. App. 361, 231 S.E.2d 133 (1976); City of Atlanta v. Fry, 148 Ga. App. 269, 251 S.E.2d 90 (1978); Barnett v. City of Albany, 149 Ga. App. 331, 254 S.E.2d 481 (1979); Martin v. City of Atlanta, 155 Ga. App. 628, 271 S.E.2d 882 (1980); DeWaters v. City of Atlanta, 169 Ga. App. 41, 311 S.E.2d 232 (1983); Corey Outdoor Adv., Inc. v. Board of Zoning Adjustments, 254 Ga. 221, 327 S.E.2d 178 (1985); Sinkfield v. Pike, 201 Ga. App. 652, 411 S.E.2d 889 (1991); Ellis v. City of Fairburn, 852 F. Supp. 1568 (N.D. Ga. 1994); Koehler v. City of Atlanta, 221 Ga. App. 534, 472 S.E.2d 91 (1996); CSX Transp. Inc. v. City of Garden City, 235 F.3d 1325 (11th Cir. 2000); Cameron v. Lang, 274 Ga. 122, 549 S.E.2d 341 (2001); City of Atlanta v. Heard, 252 Ga. App. 179, 555 S.E.2d 849 (2001); CSX Transp., Inc. v. City of Garden City, 391 F. Supp. 2d 1234 (S.D. Ga. 2005); City of Greensboro v. Rowland, 334 Ga. App. 148, 778 S.E.2d 409 (2015), cert. denied, No. S16C0305, 2016 Ga. LEXIS 154 (Ga. 2016); Williams v. DeKalb County, Ga. , 840 S.E.2d 423 (2020).

Nonliability for Governmental Functions

Policy of section. - Municipality performs governmental functions in the exercise of certain of the municipality's corporate powers, because such powers are exercised by the municipality for the benefit of the public generally, and in their exercise it represents and is an arm of the state, such as the municipality's exercise of powers pertaining to the public health and to the maintenance of charitable, penal, reformatory, and similar public institutions. However, when the municipality exercises only such powers and privileges as are peculiarly for the municipality's own benefit, or the benefit of the municipality's own citizens, or those of the municipality's immediate locality, the municipality is acting in a strictly corporate capacity. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934); Watkins v. City of Toccoa, 54 Ga. App. 8, 189 S.E. 270 (1936).

Judicial functions. - No action, in any form, can be maintained against a municipal corporation for an error in judgment when exercising judicial functions. 106 Forsyth Corp. v. Bishop, 362 F. Supp. 1389 (M.D. Ga. 1972), aff'd, 482 F.2d 280 (5th Cir. 1973), cert. denied, 422 U.S. 1044, 95 S. Ct. 2660, 45 L. Ed. 2d 696 (1975).

City was immune from liability under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(b) because the issuance of an arrest warrant was a judicial act performed by a judicial officer. Griffin v. City of Brunswick, (S.D. Ga. Nov. 30, 2005).

Rule of nonliability while performing delegated duties. - When a municipality undertakes to perform for the state duties which the state itself might perform, but which have been delegated to the municipality, and in the exercise of such function a private citizen is injured by the negligence of servants while engaged in such work, no cause of action arises against the municipality. Mayor of Savannah v. Jordon, 142 Ga. 409, 83 S.E. 109 (1914).

Rule of nonliability generally. - For acts done in the illegal performance of purely governmental functions, that is for failure to perform or errors in performing the government's legislative or judicial powers, as distinguished from neglect to perform or improper or unskillful performance of the government's ministerial duties, however illegally the authority may be exercised, a municipality is not liable. Brown v. City of Union Point, 52 Ga. App. 212, 183 S.E. 78 (1935); Foster v. Mayor of Savannah, 77 Ga. App. 346, 48 S.E.2d 686 (1948); City of Thomson v. Davis, 92 Ga. App. 216, 88 S.E.2d 300 (1955); Bagwell v. City of Gainesville, 106 Ga. App. 367, 126 S.E.2d 906 (1962); Turk v. City of Rome, 133 Ga. App. 886, 212 S.E.2d 459, aff'd, 235 Ga. 223, 219 S.E.2d 97 (1975).

Municipalities are not legally compellable or liable to pay claims arising by reason of negligence in the performance of the municipalities' governmental functions unless the legislature has delegated to the municipalities the power and authority to waive immunity from suit on claims arising because of negligence in the performance of such governmental functions. Koehler v. Massell, 229 Ga. 359, 191 S.E.2d 830 (1972).

When a homeowner claimed that the negligent repair of a sewer system caused a water main near a house to rupture, damaging the owner's home, the owner could not hold the city liable for the damage because the maintenance and repair of a sewer system was a governmental function, and, under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(a), the city could not be held liable for negligent acts of the city's employee in the performance of purely governmental functions. Goode v. City of Atlanta, 274 Ga. App. 233, 617 S.E.2d 210 (2005).

Distinction between governmental and ministerial duties. - Between a municipality and the public, the question of liability depends on whether at the time of the injury sued for the municipality was engaged in a governmental or ministerial duty. Roberts v. Mayor of Savannah, 54 Ga. App. 375, 188 S.E. 39 (1936).

When duty is of purely public nature, intended for benefit of public at large, without pretense of private gain to the municipality, no liability will attach. Cornelisen v. City of Atlanta, 146 Ga. 416, 91 S.E. 415 (1917); Harrison Co. v. City of Atlanta, 26 Ga. App. 727, 107 S.E. 83 (1921).

Applicability to negligence of driver of garbage cart for board of health. Love v. City of Atlanta, 95 Ga. 129, 22 S.E. 29 (1894).

Applicability to negligence of driver of ambulance for city hospital. Watson v. City of Atlanta, 136 Ga. 370, 71 S.E. 664 (1911).

Applicability to negligence of firefighter. Rogers v. City of Atlanta, 143 Ga. 153, 84 S.E. 555 (1915).

City's decision not to revoke an occupational tax certificate. - City was entitled to sovereign immunity against a claim by a decedent's survivors that the city allowed a known nuisance in the form of an unauthorized and unlicensed nightclub to continue attracting drugs and crime, resulting in the decedent's shooting death outside the nightclub; the city was exercising a governmental function when the city opted not to revoke the nightclub's occupational tax certificate and, therefore, was protected by immunity under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(b). City of Albany v. Stanford, 347 Ga. App. 95, 815 S.E.2d 322 (2018).

Acts of mayor in fixing bond. - Municipal corporation is not liable for the act of the mayor in requiring the plaintiff to give a larger bond than the law authorized. In fixing the amount of the bond, the mayor acted in a judicial capacity, and for an error committed in the exercise of judicial authority a municipal corporation is not liable. Gray v. Mayor of Griffin, 111 Ga. 361, 36 S.E. 792 (1900).

Traffic signals. - Trial court properly granted summary judgment to a city on a parent's negligence claim against the city stemming from a child's serious automobile accident at a known dangerous intersection that was inappropriately signaled because the city was immune from suit as the issue of whether to install a traffic signal at the intersection was a discretionary act, entitling the city to sovereign immunity; further, a successful tax referendum to fund a new traffic light did not create a duty to install a traffic light at the intersection before completing other projects. Riggins v. City of St. Marys, 264 Ga. App. 95, 589 S.E.2d 691 (2003).

Officer acting in official capacity applying sovereign immunity. - Trial court erred in denying a city and the city's police officers summary judgment as to an arrestee's claims against the city and the officers in the officers' official capacities because the claim against one of the officers in the officer's official capacity was, in reality, a suit against a governmental entity and subject to a claim of sovereign immunity, and no genuine issue of fact remained as to whether the city waived the city's sovereign immunity pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51; the alleged negligence was unrelated to the use of a motor vehicle. Campbell v. Goode, 304 Ga. App. 47, 695 S.E.2d 44 (2010).

City immune in action alleging negligence and maintenance of nuisance. - In an action alleging negligence and maintenance of a nuisance against the city, the trial court did not err in granting summary judgment to the city on the nuisance claim because the actions challenged, including disregarding alcohol violations, involved a governmental function to which sovereign immunity applied and because the insurance policy did not cover the claims, there was no legislative waiver of sovereign immunity. Gatto v. City of Statesboro, 353 Ga. App. 178, 834 S.E.2d 623 (2019).

Liability for Ministerial Functions

Second sentence of subsection (b) waives immunity whenever a municipality undertakes a proprietary function. Miree v. United States, 526 F.2d 679 (5th Cir.), different results reached on rehearing, 538 F.2d 643 (5th Cir. 1976), judgment en banc vacated, 433 U.S. 25, 97 S. Ct. 2490, 53 L. Ed. 2d 557 (1977).

Corporate capacity defined. - When a municipality exercises only such powers and privileges as are peculiarly for the municipality's own benefit, or the benefit of the municipality's own citizens, or those of the municipality's immediate locality, the municipality is acting in a strictly corporate capacity. Watkins v. City of Toccoa, 54 Ga. App. 8, 189 S.E. 270 (1936).

Rule of liability generally. - Municipal corporation in the exercise of the municipality's corporate functions performs two classes of service: (1) governmental duties; and (2) private, corporate, or ministerial, duties. It seems well settled in this state that in the negligent performance of a municipality's governmental duties a municipal corporation is not liable in damages to one who is injured while the municipality is engaged in the performance of such duties. But a different rule obtains if in the exercise or neglect of the municipality's ministerial duties one is negligently injured by a municipal corporation. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934); Watkins v. City of Toccoa, 54 Ga. App. 8, 189 S.E.2d 270 (1936); Taylor v. King, 104 Ga. App. 589, 122 S.E.2d 265 (1961); Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971).

Municipality is immune from suit for acts the municipality performs which are authorized by law and executed in accordance with the judgment or conclusion reached by the municipal authority in the exercise of a governmental function. However, a municipality is liable when there is negligence or error in the execution of plans or specifications, adopted or prescribed by a municipality, that is, for negligence or error in the exercise of a ministerial duty, a municipal government is not liable for negligence in the exercise of a governmental function. Mayor of Savannah v. Palmerio, 242 Ga. 419, 249 S.E.2d 224 (1978).

Payment of salary to government employees is a perfunctory administrative duty not included under the category of government functions and is not barred by any statutory immunity. Smith v. City of Atlanta, 167 Ga. App. 458, 306 S.E.2d 720 (1983).

To bar a municipal employee from recovering pay for services the employee performed by allowing the municipality to claim statutory immunity would violate the prohibition against the impairment of a contract which is found in both the state and federal constitutions. Smith v. City of Atlanta, 167 Ga. App. 458, 306 S.E.2d 720 (1983).

Waiver of liability for ministerial duties does not apply to counties. - Waiver of sovereign immunity for claims alleging the negligent performance of ministerial duties only applies to cities and does not apply to counties. O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(b) provides that for neglect to perform or improper or unskillful performance of their ministerial duties, municipal corporations shall be liable. O.C.G.A. § 36-1-4 sets out the sovereign immunity of counties and contains no such waiver for ministerial duties. Klingensmith v. Long County, 352 Ga. App. 21, 833 S.E.2d 608 (2019).

Facility designed to maximize revenues. - Municipality may be liable for failure to safely maintain a public facility, even though the municipality is not expressly given the power to operate the facility primarily as a source of revenue, if the facility is in fact designed to "maximize" revenues rather than to be operated primarily for the general good of the public; the duty of proper maintenance would, in such a case, be ministerial. Cleghorn v. City of Albany, 184 Ga. App. 732, 362 S.E.2d 386, cert. denied, 184 Ga. App. 909, 362 S.E.2d 386 (1989).

When city maintained a market house the city is under a duty to keep the market house in a safe condition, the market house being property of the city and used for the city's revenues. The city's duty is ministerial and the city is liable for injuries sustained by the plaintiff by stepping through a hole in the floor. Mayor of Savannah v. Cullens, 38 Ga. 334 (1868).

Improvement of streets by city. - Defense of sovereign immunity was not available to the city, when the city's management of the project included hiring the contractor and placing the city's on-site construction inspector on the property to actively oversee the construction work on a daily basis. Consequently, the city was performing a ministerial function in improving the streets and sidewalks. City of Atlanta v. Atlantic Realty Co., 205 Ga. App. 1, 421 S.E.2d 113 (1992).

Applicability to neglect of duty of city officer in maintaining waterworks. City Council v. Mackey, 113 Ga. 64, 38 S.E. 339 (1901).

Applicability to failure of duty of officer in maintaining city electric light wires and plant. Sedlmeyr v. City of Fitzgerald, 140 Ga. 614, 79 S.E. 469 (1913).

Operation of stone quarry. - Operation by the city of a stone quarry which the city owns is purely ministerial. City Council v. Owens, 111 Ga. 464, 36 S.E. 830 (1900).

Payment to a corporation for work performed under a written contract with a city is a ministerial duty not included under the category of government functions and not barred by any statutory immunity. McCrary Eng'g Corp. v. City of Bowdon, 170 Ga. App. 462, 317 S.E.2d 308 (1984).

Failure to provide medical care to inmate. - In a negligence action filed by an inmate based on the city's and the police chief's failure to provide medical care to the inmate, because the provision of medical care to inmates in the city's and the police chief's custody was a ministerial act, as the duty was imposed by statute, and medical care was a fundamental right of inmates in custody, sovereign or governmental immunity was not applicable, and the trial court did not err by denying the city's and the police chief's motion to dismiss for failure to state a claim based on sovereign immunity. City of Atlanta v. Mitcham, 262 Ga. App. 754, 586 S.E.2d 430 (2013).

The care of inmates in the custody of a municipal corporation is a governmental function for which sovereign immunity has not been waived. City of Atlanta v. Mitcham, 296 Ga. 576, 769 S.E.2d 320 (2015).

Inmate precluded from pursuing negligence claim. - Appellate court erred by affirming a trial court's denial of a city's motion to dismiss an inmate's complaint because the care of inmates in the custody of a municipal corporation is a governmental function for which sovereign immunity has not been waived; therefore, the inmate was precluded from pursuing negligence claims. City of Atlanta v. Mitcham, 296 Ga. 576, 769 S.E.2d 320 (2015).

Claims arising from improper detention. - In a detainee's suit against a sheriff, county, and city arising out of the detainee's improper detention, the defendants' motion to dismiss was denied as to the sheriff's individual liability for violations of federal law, and for failure to update the detainee's criminal record as required by O.C.G.A. § 42-4-7 and bring the detainee before a judicial officer; however, claims against the city and county were dismissed based on immunity under Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Para. IX(d) and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. IX. Purvis v. City of Atlanta, 142 F. Supp. 3d 1337 (N.D. Ga. 2015).

Nuisances

Liability for personal injury from continuing nuisance. - A line of cases hold municipalities liable for personal injuries resulting from a continuing nuisance despite this section must be read to be a common-law exception to the general statutory rule that municipalities are immune. Miree v. United States, 526 F.2d 679 (5th Cir.), different results reached on rehearing, 538 F.2d 643 (5th Cir. 1976), judgment en banc vacated, 433 U.S. 25, 97 S. Ct. 2490, 53 L. Ed. 2d 557 (1977).

Rule of nonliability is not to be confused with nuisance. Cannon v. City of Macon, 81 Ga. App. 310, 58 S.E.2d 563 (1950), later appeal, 89 Ga. App. 484, 79 S.E.2d 816 (1954).

To be held liable for maintenance of a nuisance, a municipality must be chargeable with performing a continuous or regularly repetitious act, or creating a continuous or regularly repetitious condition which causes the hurt, inconvenience, or injury; the municipality must have knowledge or be chargeable with notice of the dangerous condition. Mayor of Savannah v. Palmerio, 242 Ga. 419, 249 S.E.2d 224 (1978).

What is nuisance. - That which the law authorizes to be done, if done as the law authorizes, cannot be a nuisance. Thus, if the act is lawful in itself, the act becomes a nuisance only when conducted in an illegal manner to the hurt, inconvenience, or damage of another. Mayor of Savannah v. Palmerio, 242 Ga. 419, 249 S.E.2d 224 (1978).

Negligence not essential ingredient in action against municipality - When a municipality in the exercise of the municipality's functions, both governmental and ministerial, creates a nuisance which is specially injurious to an individual, such individual may have a cause of action for damages, and negligence is not an essential ingredient of the action. Foster v. Mayor of Savannah, 77 Ga. App. 346, 48 S.E.2d 686 (1948); Ingram v. City of Acworth, 90 Ga. App. 719, 84 S.E.2d 99 (1954); City of Thomson v. Davis, 92 Ga. App. 216, 88 S.E.2d 300 (1955); Stanley v. City of Macon, 95 Ga. App. 108, 97 S.E.2d 330 (1957); Mayor of Savannah v. Palmerio, 242 Ga. 419, 249 S.E.2d 224 (1978); Duffield v. DeKalb County, 242 Ga. 432, 249 S.E.2d 235 (1978); Leake v. City of Atlanta, 146 Ga. App. 57, 245 S.E.2d 338 (1978); Porter v. City of Gainesville, 147 Ga. App. 274, 248 S.E.2d 501 (1978); City of Columbus v. Myszka, 246 Ga. 571, 272 S.E.2d 302 (1980).

Sovereign immunity for negligence but not nuisance. - Trial court erred in not granting a city's motion to dismiss the negligence claims against the city because the city was exercising a governmental function when the city demolished an abandoned house which was claimed to be a nuisance; therefore, the city was entitled to sovereign immunity on those claims. City of Atlanta v. Durham, 324 Ga. App. 563, 751 S.E.2d 172 (2013).

No right to create and maintain nuisance. - While municipal corporations do have certain sovereign governmental powers which cannot be superintended by the courts, in the exercise of such powers municipal corporations have no right to create and maintain a nuisance hurtful to private citizens. Cannon v. City of Macon, 81 Ga. App. 310, 58 S.E.2d 563 (1950), later appeal, 89 Ga. App. 484, 79 S.E.2d 816 (1954).

Training of police officers. - Plaintiff's claims against the city that training of the city's police in the operation of police cars created a nuisance failed as a one-time occurrence of a car collision was insufficient evidence to prove a specific failure or specific negligence in training. Banks v. Mayor of Savannah, 210 Ga. App. 62, 435 S.E.2d 68 (1993).

Municipality may be liable for trespass in execution of governmental function only if such trespass constitutes a nuisance or constitutes the taking or damaging of private property for public use without just and adequate compensation first being paid. City of Atlanta v. Minder, 83 Ga. App. 295, 63 S.E.2d 420 (1951).

Adjoining landowners. - Municipality, as owner of real estate, owes the same duties to the owners of neighboring lands, with respect to the use of the municipality's own, as are owed by a private owner of land, and hence a municipality is liable to other landowners when it makes such use of the municipality's land as to constitute a nuisance, regardless of whether the municipality is engaged in performing a governmental or private function. This rule is equally applicable whether the actual injury is personal or property damage. Stanley v. City of Macon, 95 Ga. App. 108, 97 S.E.2d 330 (1957).

Increased noise and odors. - Term property comprehends not only the thing possessed, but also, in strict legal parlance, means the rights of the owner in relation to land or a thing; the right of a person to possess, use, enjoy, and dispose of the land or thing, and the corresponding right to exclude others from the use. Therefore, no physical invasion damaging to the property need be shown, only an unlawful interference with the right of the owner to enjoy the owner's possession. Thus, increased noise and odors may result in an inverse condemnation of property by interfering with the use and enjoyment of land and endangering health. Duffield v. DeKalb County, 242 Ga. 432, 249 S.E.2d 235 (1978).

Overflowing water. - When a municipality, in constructing a public improvement, obstructs the natural flow of surface water so as to cause the water to pond upon the land of an abutting owner, and the city provides no means of outlet for such water, the city becomes liable to the property owner for any damages occasioned to the landowner's property thereby. If the ponding of such water on private property constitutes a nuisance, which the city fails to abate, the municipality may be held liable. City of Rome v. Brown, 54 Ga. App. 6, 186 S.E. 708 (1936), aff'd, 184 Ga. 34, 190 S.E. 787 (1937).

Sewage. - When the city knowingly allowed human sewage from the city's sewerage system to flow across appellee's property for many months, the case was one of nuisance for which the city was liable and not a case of discretionary nonfeasance. City of Columbus v. Myszka, 246 Ga. 571, 272 S.E.2d 302 (1980).

Failure to provide holding cell. - Mere failure to provide a holding cell at a police station is not a nuisance for which a municipality may be liable to one allegedly injured thereby. McDay v. City of Atlanta, 204 Ga. App. 621, 420 S.E.2d 75, cert. denied, 204 Ga. App. 922, 420 S.E.2d 75 (1992).

Municipality not liable for failure to abate nuisance. - As a general rule, the duty imposed upon municipalities to abate nuisances existing upon private property within the municipality's limits is a duty which is judicial in the municipality's nature, and for failure to perform this duty, or for errors in the performance of the duty, the municipality is not liable in damages. Mayor of Dalton v. Wilson, 118 Ga. 100, 44 S.E. 830 (1903).

When nuisance is in or near public street, the municipality is liable to one who suffers special damage from the failure of the city to abate such nuisance. Parker v. Mayor of Macon, 39 Ga. 725 (1869); Mayor of Dalton v. Wilson, 118 Ga. 100, 44 S.E. 830 (1903).

Officers and Employees

This section should be construed together in connection with the section's cognate sections, and as intending to declare that municipal liability should attach only for neglect to perform, or for improper or unskillful performance of "ministerial duties." This construction would leave intact the common-law doctrine, frequently applied in this state before and since adoption of the Code, of nonliability for conduct of officers, agents, and servants of municipal corporations in respect to duties devolving upon the officers, agents, and servants in virtue of the sovereign or governmental functions of the municipality. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934).

Rule of nonliability for governmental functions. - When an injury sustained is inflicted because of the misfeasance of an agent of a corporation while engaged in the exercise of what are termed "governmental functions of a corporation," the city is not liable. When injuries are inflicted by the agent of a corporation acting for the corporation in the discharge of a duty when the corporation is engaged in the exercise of some private franchise, or some franchise conferred upon the corporation by law which the corporation may exercise for the private profit or convenience of the corporation or for the convenience of the corporation's citizens alone, in which the general public has no interest, a right of recovery lies against the city. Brannan v. City of Brunswick, 49 Ga. App. 62, 174 S.E. 186 (1934); Roberts v. Mayor of Savannah, 54 Ga. App. 375, 188 S.E. 39 (1936); City of Atlanta v. Garner, 56 Ga. App. 435, 192 S.E. 841 (1937); Banks v. City of Albany, 83 Ga. App. 640, 64 S.E.2d 93 (1951).

Police pursuit of stolen vehicle. - Summary judgment for city on ground of sovereign immunity was proper in case of decedent who was killed when struck by a stolen car which was being chased by city police officers since the death did not arise from the use, maintenance, or operation of the city's motor vehicle but was due to the negligence or wilful misconduct of a fleeing felon in running a red light. Peeples v. City of Atlanta, 189 Ga. App. 888, 377 S.E.2d 889 (1989).

Liability for acts of officers contrary to law. - When an act is done by the officers and agents of a municipal corporation, which is within the corporate power and might have been lawfully accomplished had the municipal authorities proceeded according to law, the corporation will be liable for the consequences of an act of such officers or agents proceeding contrary to law or in an irregular manner. It is otherwise when the act complained of lies wholly outside of the general or special powers of the corporation. Langley v. City Council, 118 Ga. 590, 45 S.E. 486 (1903); McDonald v. Butler, 10 Ga. App. 845, 74 S.E. 573 (1912).

Failure to provide police protection. - When failure to provide police protection is alleged, there can be no liability based on a municipality's duty to protect the general public. However, when there is a special relationship between the individual and the municipality which sets the individual apart from the general public and engenders a special duty owed to that individual, the municipality may be subject to liability for the nonfeasance of the municipality's police department. City of Rome v. Jordan, 263 Ga. 26, 426 S.E.2d 861 (1993).

Deputy sheriff was not liable to the widow of a motorist killed in a collision with a drunk driver whom the deputy had failed to arrest or otherwise restrain from driving; although the deputy may have been present at the scene of the crime in that the deputy observed an intoxicated driver, the deputy's duty to enforce drunk driving laws was to the public in general, not specifically to the motorist who was killed hours later in a collision with the intoxicated driver at another location. Landis v. Rockdale County, 212 Ga. App. 700, 445 S.E.2d 264 (1994).

Arrest. - In an action arising out of an arrest, despite the way the arrestee was treated, the trial court properly dismissed a complaint against a county and granted summary judgment on the same complaint against a city on sovereign immunity grounds since the arrestee failed to show that the immunity had been waived. Scott v. City of Valdosta, 280 Ga. App. 481, 634 S.E.2d 472 (2006).

In an arrestee's state law claims, a city was not liable for actions of the city's police officers because the officers engaged in protected ministerial functions. Lavassani v. City of Canton, 760 F. Supp. 2d 1346 (N.D. Ga. 2010).

Municipalities are liable for the acts of the municipalities' officers, agents, and servants only: (a) in the performance of any function if a statute specifically provides for such liability; (b) for neglect to perform, or improper or unskillful performance of ministerial duties; (c) for the performance of governmental functions when the function amounts to the taking or damaging of private property for public purposes without first making adequate compensation therefor, or the creation of a nuisance dangerous to the life and health of persons because of its proximity to people in the enjoyment of their property. Stubbs v. City of Macon, 78 Ga. App. 237, 50 S.E.2d 866 (1948).

Employee's personal liability. - Government employee who commits a wrongful or tortious act violates a duty the employee owes to the one who is injured and is personally liable, even though the municipal employer may be exempt from liability under the doctrine of governmental immunity. Foster v. Crowder, 117 Ga. App. 568, 161 S.E.2d 364 (1968).

Trespass of officers. - Municipal corporation is not liable in damages for a trespass committed by the municipality's officers in wrongfully disinterring and removing the remains of a person buried in a cemetery owned and controlled by the city, unless the act was performed in pursuance of and to effectuate some corporate power conferred by the municipal charter. McDonald v. Butler, 10 Ga. App. 845, 74 S.E. 573 (1912).

Government immune from liability based on officer's actions. - Doctrine of governmental immunity protected the city from liability for the actions of the city's employees, including the police officer who arrested the individual for criminal trespass in the discharge of the officer's lawful duties, and, thus, the city was protected by that immunity from the arrested individual's claims against the city. Reese v. City of Atlanta, 261 Ga. App. 761, 583 S.E.2d 584 (2003).

Notice of change of group health insurance carrier. - City's duty to give reasonable notice to government employees that the city intended to change group health insurance carriers was a perfunctory administrative duty not included under the category of government functions and not barred by any statutory immunity. City of Brunswick v. Carney, 187 Ga. App. 634, 371 S.E.2d 201, cert. denied, 187 Ga. App. 907, 370 S.E.2d 194 (1988).

Summary judgment based on sovereign immunity improper. - Trial court erred in granting a police officer and a city summary judgment on the ground that the officer was performing a discretionary duty and the city was protected by sovereign immunity in an arrestee's action to recover damages for injuries sustained when the officer ran over the arrestee's foot with a patrol car during the arrest. A jury could find that the officer did not act intentionally, but rather, negligently came too close to the arrestee. Moreover, there was an issue of fact on whether the arrestee assumed the risk of injury when the arrestee had not threatened the officer with deadly force. Davis v. Batchelor, 300 Ga. App. 662, 686 S.E.2d 314 (2009).

Parks and Recreation

Park as governmental function. - When a city maintains a park primarily for the use of the public, intended as a place of resort for pleasure and promotion of health of the public at large, the city's operation is by virtue of the governmental powers of the municipality, and no municipal liability would attach to the nonperformance or improper performance of the duties of the officers, agents, or servants of the city in respect to keeping the park safe for use by members of the general public. Cornelisen v. City of Atlanta, 146 Ga. 416, 91 S.E. 415 (1917); Harvey v. Mayor of Savannah, 59 Ga. App. 12, 199 S.E. 653 (1938); Porter v. City of Gainesville, 147 Ga. 274, 248 S.E.2d 501 (1978); City Council v. Lee, 153 Ga. App. 94, 264 S.E.2d 683 (1980).

In the absence of charter authority to the contrary, the maintenance of a park by a municipality is a governmental function, and the municipality is not liable for the nonperformance or improper performance of the municipality's officers, agents, or servants in connection therewith. Stubbs v. City of Macon, 78 Ga. App. 237, 50 S.E.2d 866 (1948).

Parks distinguished from streets. - Legislative act placing city squares under the exclusive control and management of the park and tree commission of the city as to "all matters and things relating to the care, preservation, improvement, good order, and regulation generally" of the squares, fixed their status as parks, the control and management of which were in the exercise of a government function. Consequently, no liability attached to the city when, as alleged in the petition in the present case, the plaintiff was injured on a sidewalk in a square because of the alleged negligence of the city in the city's maintenance thereof, and the court properly sustained the general demurrer (now motion to dismiss) to the petition. Harvey v. Mayor of Savannah, 59 Ga. App. 12, 199 S.E. 653 (1938).

Operation of public recreational swimming facilities, primarily for public benefit rather than for revenue production, is a governmental function, so cities are shielded from negligence claims by the doctrine of governmental immunity. Robinson v. City of Decatur, 253 Ga. 779, 325 S.E.2d 752 (1985), cert. denied and appeal dismissed, 484 U.S. 998, 108 S. Ct. 685, 98 L. Ed. 2d 638 (1988); Gooden v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. App. 786, 531 S.E.2d 364 (2000).

Auditorium as governmental function. - Municipality is not liable to one injured by the negligence of the municipality's employees in the operation of a city auditorium, when, at the time of the injury, the municipality, through the municipality's governing officials had permitted the use of the auditorium for public purposes and discussion of matters connected with rehabilitation loans to be made by the federal government, in that the city was engaged in the exercise of a purely governmental function in the maintenance and operation of the auditorium. The fact that the auditorium might be used for profit on other occasions would not render the city liable to one injured at the time the auditorium was being used strictly for governmental purposes. Roberts v. Mayor of Savannah, 54 Ga. App. 375, 188 S.E. 39 (1936).

When it is alleged that in operating a city auditorium the municipal corporation derived profit by renting or leasing the auditorium from time to time for private purposes, in the absence of an allegation that the city had charter authority to rent or lease such public building primarily as a source of revenue, no liability attaches to the city when one is injured because of the negligence of the city's agents while at work in repairing such building. City of Atlanta v. Garner, 56 Ga. App. 435, 192 S.E. 841 (1937); Granat v. Mayor of Savannah, 59 Ga. App. 276, 200 S.E. 311 (1938).

Golf course. - City has governmental immunity from tort liability in the operation of a golf course. City of Atlanta v. Mapel, 121 Ga. App. 567, 174 S.E.2d 599 (1970).

Paving of a walkway along the outer edge of a city park, but within the park, by the municipality in connection with the installation of automobile parking meters so as to leave a water meter projecting above the surface of the paved walkway in a manner dangerous to pedestrians using the walkway amounts to a governmental function in connection with the construction and maintenance of a city park. The fact that the area is also used in connection with parking meters providing revenue for the city does not make the function ministerial, this function also being governmental. Stubbs v. City of Macon, 78 Ga. App. 237, 50 S.E.2d 866 (1948).

Playground equipment. - Operation and maintenance of playground equipment so designed as to be dangerous to life or health is a nuisance for which an action against a municipality may be maintained. Porter v. City of Gainesville, 147 Ga. App. 274, 248 S.E.2d 501 (1978).

Public bathing beach. - Municipality is not liable for the negligent performance, or for the failure to perform the municipality's duty in the maintenance of a public bathing beach and appurtenances thereto, for whatever duty exists to maintain the beach and the beach's appurtenances is in virtue of the municipality's governmental powers and no municipal liability would attach on account of the municipality's negligent or unskillful performance of these duties. Tarver v. Savannah Beach, 96 Ga. App. 491, 100 S.E.2d 616 (1957).

Dog show in city auditorium. - Maintenance by the city of a dog show in the city auditorium, as would be the maintenance by the city of a menagerie in one of the city's public parks, or the maintenance of any other show for the pleasure and entertainment of the public and not for pecuniary gain or profit, is the performance of a governmental power. Granat v. Mayor of Savannah, 59 Ga. App. 276, 200 S.E. 311 (1938).
